sv: Företag och industri > Skyltar: Öppettidsskyltar; Digitala skyltar; Elektriska skyltar; Nödskyltar och nödutgångsskyltar; Företagsskyltar; Skyltar med öppettider; Parkeringsskyltar och parkeringstillstånd; Policyskyltar; Butiksskyltar och reaskyltar; Väg- och trafikskyltar; Varningsskyltar; Säkerhetsskyltar; Skyltar för trädgårdar och trottoarer
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Bảng chỉ dẫn: Bảng ghi giờ làm việc cho doanh nghiệp; Dấu hiệu kỹ thuật số; Biển báo chạy điện; Biển báo khẩn cấp và thoát hiểm; Biển tên phòng chức năng; Biển thông báo đóng cửa & mở cửa; Biển báo và giấy phép dừng đỗ xe; Biển báo quy định chính sách; Biển/ bảng quảng cáo và khuyến mại; Biển báo giao thông; Biển báo an toàn và cảnh báo nguy hiểm; Biển báo an ninh; Biển báo khu vực vỉa hè và sân chơi
nb: Forretninger og industri > Skilting: Skilter med åpningstider; Digitale skilt; Elektriske skilt; Nød- og utgangsskilt; Skilt for anleggsidentifikasjon; Åpent- og lukket-skilt; Parkeringsskilt og -tillatelser; Skilt med retningslinjer; Detaljhandels- og salgsskilt; Vei- og trafikkskilt; Sikkerhets- og advarselsskilt; Sikkerhetsskilt; Fortaus- og bakgårdsskilt
tr: İş ve Endüstri > İşaret ve Tabelalar: İş Saati Levhaları; Dijital Tabelalar; Elektronik Tabelalar; Acil Durum ve Çıkış Tabelaları; Tesis Tabelaları; Açık ve Kapalı Levhaları; Park Tabelaları ve İzinleri; Politika Tabelaları; Perakende ve Satış Tabelaları; Yol ve Trafik İşaretleri; Emniyet ve Uyarı Tabelaları; Güvenlik Tabelaları; Kaldırım ve Bahçe Tabelaları
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Знаки и вывески: Вывески с часами работы; Цифровые вывески; Светящиеся вывески; Аварийные знаки и указатели выхода; Знаки идентификации помещений; Знаки «Открыто» и «Закрыто»; Знаки автостоянки; Знаки с правилами; Вывески для розничной торговли; Дорожные знаки и указатели; Предупреждающие знаки и надписи; Знаки для охраняемых объектов; Знаки и вывески для тротуаров и дворов
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Jelzések: Nyitvatartási jelzések; Digitális jelzések; Elektromos jelzések; Vészhelyzeti és kijárati jelzések; Létesítményazonosító jelzések; Nyitva és zárva jelzések; Parkolási jelzések és engedélyek; Politikai jelzések; Kiskereskedelmi és értékesítési jelzések; Közúti és közlekedési jelzések; Biztonsági és figyelmeztető jelzések; Biztonsági jelzések; Járda- és udvarjelzések
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 廣告牌: 營業時間招牌; 數位看板; 電子看板; 緊急出口標誌; 指示牌; 營業招牌/休息招牌; 允許停車標誌; 店規牌子; 零售/促銷標誌; 道路交通標誌; 安全/警告標誌; 告示看板; 落地招牌
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Σήμανση: Πινακίδες ωραρίου λειτουργίας; Ψηφιακές πινακίδες; Ηλεκτρικές επιγραφές; Πινακίδες έκτακτης ανάγκης και εξόδου; Πινακίδες αναγνώρισης εγκαταστάσεων; Πινακίδες τύπου «Ανοιχτό» & «Κλειστό»; Πινακίδες & άδειες Στάθμευσης; Πινακίδες πολιτικής (που ισχύει σε έναν χώρο); Πινακίδες λιανικής & προσφορών; Πινακίδες οδικής κυκλοφορίας; Πινακίδες ασφαλείας & προειδοποίησης; Σημάδια ασφαλείας; Πινακίδες πεζοδρομίου & εξωτερικών χώρων
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Signalizacija: Oznake radnog vremena; Digitalni znakovi; Električni znakovi; Znakovi za hitne slučajeve i izlaz; Znakovi za identifikaciju objekata; Znakovi s natpisima Zatvoreno i Otvoreno; Znakovi i dozvole za parkiranje; Znakovi za pravila; Znakovi za maloprodaju i sniženja; Cestovni i prometni znakovi; Znakovi sigurnosti i upozorenja; Sigurnosni znakovi; Znakovi za pločnike i dvorišta
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Gevel- en uitgangborden: Openingstijdenbordjes; Digitale borden; Elektrische borden; Noodseinen en nooduitgangsborden; Identificatiemeldingen voor faciliteiten; Open- en gesloten-bordjes; Parkeerborden en -vergunningen; Beleidsborden; Retail- en verkoopmeldingen; Verkeersborden; Veiligheids- en waarschuwingsborden; Beveiligingsborden; Trottoir- en parkmeldingen
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 신호: 영업 시간 표지판; 디지털 사인; 전광판; 비상/비상구 표지판; 시설 안내 표지판; 영업 시작/영업 종료 표지판; 주차/주차 제한 표지판; 안내문 표지판; 상점/세일 표지판; 도로/교통 표지판; 안전/경고 표지판; 보안 표지판; 보도 및 야드 표지판
da: Erhverv og industri > Skiltning: Skilte til åbningstider; Digitale skilte; Elektroniske skilte; Advarsels-, nødudgangs- og udgangsskilte; Identifikationsskilte; Skilte til Åbent og Lukket; Parkeringsskilte og tilladelser; Politiskilte; Detail- og salgsskilte; Vej- og trafikskilte; Sikkerheds- og advarselsskilte; Sikkerhedsskilte; Sandwichskilte og fortovsskilte
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Beschilderung: Öffnungszeiten-Schilder; Digitale Schilder; Elektronische Schilder; Notfall- & Notausgangsschilder; Wegweiser; Geöffnet- und Geschlossen-Schilder; Parkplatzschilder; Hinweisschilder; Einzelhandelsschilder; Verkehrsschilder; Warnschilder; Sicherheitsschilder; Tragbare Schilder
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Označevanje: Oznake delovnega časa; Digitalni znaki; Električni znaki; Znaki za izhod v sili in izhod; Znaki za identifikacijo objektov; Znaki za odprto in zaprto; Parkirni znaki in dovolilnice; Znaki s pravilniki; Znaki za maloprodajo in prodajo; Cestni in prometni znaki; Varnostni in opozorilni znaki; Varnostni znaki; Znaki za pločnike in dvorišča
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Viitat: Aukioloaikakyltit; Digitaaliset kyltit; Sähköiset kyltit; Varoituskyltit ja poistumisopasteet; Tilaopasteet; Aukiolokyltit; Pysäköintiopasteet ja -kiellot; Ohjekilvet; Mainoskyltit; Liikennemerkit; Turvallisuus- ja varoituskyltit; Turvamerkit; Kävelytie- ja pihakyltit
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 标识牌: 营业时间标识; 数字标牌; 电子看板; 紧急/出口标识; 设施标识; 开门/关门标识; 停车/许可证标识; 提示标语板; 店铺招牌/促销标识; 道路/交通标识; 安全/警示标识; 安保标识; A型立式/草坪地插广告板
it: Commercio e industria > Segnaletica: Cartelli con orario di apertura; Cartelli digitali; Insegne elettriche; Segnaletica di emergenza e di uscita; Segnali di identificazione luoghi di interesse; Cartelli di aperto/chiuso; Segnali di parcheggio e permessi; Segnali di regolamento; Insegne di negozi e punti vendita al dettaglio; Segnaletica stradale e del traffico; Segnali di sicurezza e avviso; Segnaletica di sicurezza; Segnaletica per marciapiedi e cortili
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > ป้ายโฆษณา: ป้ายบอกเวลาทำการ; ป้ายดิจิทัล; ป้ายไฟ; ป้ายทางออกและป้ายฉุกเฉิน; ป้ายระบุสิ่งอำนวยความสะดวก; ป้ายเปิดและปิด; ป้ายจอดรถและใบอนุญาต; ป้ายนโยบาย; ป้ายค้าปลีกและป้ายขาย; ป้ายจราจรและป้ายถนน; ป้ายเตือนและป้ายความปลอดภัย; ป้ายความปลอดภัย; ป้ายทางเดินและป้ายสนาม
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 看板・標識: 営業時間案内プレート; デジタルサイネージ; 電飾看板; 非常口標識; 施設用標識; 営業案内プレート; 駐車標識; ポリシー標識; 店舗用看板; 道路・交通標識; 安全・警告標識; セキュリティ標識; 歩道・庭用看板
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Указателни знаци: Табелки за работно време; Цифрови знаци; Електрически знаци; Аварийни знаци и знаци за изход; Идентификационни знаци на съоръжения; Знаци за отворено и затворено; Знаци и разрешителни за паркиране; Политически знаци; Знаци за търговски обекти; Пътни знаци; Предупредителни и знаци за безопасност; Знаци за сигурност; Тротоарни и дворни знаци
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Označenia: Označenie úradných hodín; Digitálne nápisy; Elektrické nápisy; Označenie núdzového východu; Identifikačné znaky zariadenia; Tabuľka Otvorené/zatvorené; Parkovacie označenia a povolenia; Bezpečnostné upozornenia; Maloobchodné pútače; Cestné a dopravné značky; Bezpečnostné a výstražné značky; Bezpečnostné značky; Značky na chodníkoch
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Informacja wizualna: Tablice z godzinami otwarcia; Monitory informacyjne; Znaki elektroniczne; Znaki awaryjne i ewakuacyjne; Znaki informacyjne w budynkach; Szyldy „Otwarte” i „Zamknięte”; Znaki parkingowe i zezwolenia; Oznaczenia informacyjne; Plakaty i znaki reklamowe; Znaki drogowe; Znaki bezpieczeństwa i ostrzegawcze; Tablice ostrzegawcze; Reklamy chodnikowe i ogrodowe
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Sinalização: Sinais de horário de funcionamento; Sinais digitais; Sinais elétricos; Sinais de emergência e de saída; Sinais de identificação de instalações; Sinais aberto e fechado; Sinais de estacionamento e autorizações; Sinais de polícia; Sinais de retalho e vendas; Sinais rodoviários e de trânsito; Sinais de segurança e aviso; Sinais de segurança; Sinais de passeios e jardins
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Signalétique: Panneaux d’horaires; Enseignes numériques; Enseignes électriques; Panneaux de secours et d’évacuation; Panneaux de signalétique intérieure; Panneaux d’ouverture et de fermeture; Panneaux de parking et de stationnement; Panneaux de réglementation; Panneaux publicitaires; Panneaux de signalisation routière; Signalétique de danger et d’avertissement; Panneaux de sécurité; Chevalets stop-trottoir et enseignes publicitaires de jardin
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Semnalizare: Panouri cu programul de lucru; Panouri digitale; Panouri electrice; Indicatoare de urgență și de ieșire; Indicatoare de identificare a instalației; Indicatoare deschis și închis; Indicatoare de parcare și permise; Indicatoare politică; Panouri retail/reduceri; Semne rutiere și de circulație; Indicatoare de siguranță și avertizare; Indicatoare de securitate; Indicatoare pentru trotuar și curte
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Značení: Vývěsky s otevírací dobou; Digitální značení; Elektrické poutače; Tabulky pro nouzové situace a označení východu; Tabulky pro informační značení; Vývěsky s nápisem otevřeno/zavřeno; Parkovací značky a povolení; Informační tabulky; Slevové vývěsky; Dopravní značky; Bezpečnostní a výstražné tabulky; Varovné tabulky; Reklamní tabule a stojany
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Sinalização: Placas de horário de funcionamento; Placas digitais; Placas de sinalização eletrônicas; Placas de emergência e saída; Placas de identificação de instalação; Placas de aberto e fechado; Placas de estacionamento e permissões; Placas de regulamentos; Placas de varejo e vendas; Placas de trânsito e tráfego; Placas de segurança e advertência; Placas de segurança; Placas para calçadas e jardins
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Ženklinimas: Darbo laiko ženklai; Skaitmeniniai ženklai; Elektriniai ženklai; Avariniai ir išėjimo ženklai; Patalpų identifikavimo ženklai; Ženklai „atidaryta“ ir „uždaryta“; Stovėjimo ženklai ir leidimai; Taisykles nurodantys ženklai; Mažmeninės prekybos ir išpardavimo iškabos; Kelių eismo ženklai; Saugos ir įspėjamieji ženklai; Saugumo ženklai; Šaligatvių ir kiemų ženklai
es: Economía e industria > Avisos: Carteles de horarios laborales; Rótulos digitales; Señales eléctricas; Señales de emergencia y salida; Señales de identificación de instalaciones; Carteles de abierto y cerrado; Señales de estacionamiento y vados; Señales de normas; Señales de venta y rebajas; Señales de carretera y tráfico; Señales de advertencia y protección; Señales de seguridad; Señales para acera y patio
en: Business & Industrial > Signage: Business Hour Signs; Digital Signs; Electric Signs; Emergency & Exit Signs; Facility Identification Signs; Open & Closed Signs; Parking Signs & Permits; Policy Signs; Retail & Sale Signs; Road & Traffic Signs; Safety & Warning Signs; Security Signs; Sidewalk & Yard Signs